Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall provide grants
to local governments and nonprofit corporations that agree to, within  90 days of receipt of
grant funding, enter into an agreement among  the member governments and nonprofit cor-
porations, if any, to create a coordinated homeless response system that consists of, at a
minimum:
(a) The establishment of a coordinated homeless response office;
(b) An advisory board with representation from the governing body of each member
government;
(c) Specific roles of each member to support the advisory board and office;
(d) Plans for coordination with  any local continuum of care receiving funding under 24
C.F.R. part 578; and
(e) The establishment of a centralized point of contact for the office.
(2) Grants provided under this section shall be used by the coordinated homeless re-
sponse system to:
(a) Hire necessary staff for the office;
(b) Support coordinated communications and public engagement;
(c) Support community outreach and policy development, including  stipends for people
with current or recent lived experience of homelessness;
Enrolled House Bill 4123 (HB 4123-A) Page 1
(d) Acquire technical  assistance and capacity building, including contracting with con-
sultants; and
(e) Pay for other expenses reasonably necessary to meet the requirements under  this
section.
(3) Within one year of  receiving a grant under this section, a coordinated homeless re-
sponse system, through the advisory board or  each member government to the agreement,
shall adopt a five-year strategic plan that will identify and set goals for addressing:
(a) Funding to support the ongoing operations of the  coordinated homeless response
system;
(b) Increasing or streamlining resources and services to people at risk of or experiencing
homelessness within the participating cities and counties;
(c) Incorporating national best practices for ending homelessness;
(d) Eliminating racial disparities within homeless services within the service area; and
(e) Creating pathways to permanent and  supportive housing that is affordable to local
populations experiencing or at risk of homelessness.
(4) No later than November 15, 2023, and  September 15, 2024, each coordinated homeless
response system shall  provide a report to the Housing and Community Services Department,
Oregon Housing Stability Council and one or more appropriate interim  committees of the
Legislative Assembly in the manner provided in ORS 192.245 on:
(a) The goals adopted in the five-year strategic plan and the progress made  in imple-
menting the plan;
(b) Other changes in homelessness  services, ordinances of member governments relating
to homelessness and  partnerships or programs established that are specifically related to
member government actions arising out of the agreement; and
(c) Identified challenges and opportunities relating to:
(A) Regional coordination of homelessness services and planning;
(B) Needs for technical assistance  regarding program development or other programs
from the Housing and Community Services Department; and
(C) Addressing racial  disparities through partnerships with culturally specific and re-
sponsive organizations serving populations overrepresented in experiencing homelessness,
including Black, Indigenous, People of Color, federally recognized  tribes and tribal members
and outreach and engagement with these populations.
(5) In performing tasks under this section, a coordinated homeless response system shall
coordinate with and develop partnerships with local and regional stakeholders, including, but
not limited to:
(a) Advocates for  people experiencing homelessness and for people with lived experience
of homelessness;
(b) Community action agencies;
(c) Housing authorities;
(d) Affordable housing providers;
(e) Behavioral health providers;
(f) Law enforcement;
(g) Educational agency liaisons for homeless children as described in 42 U.S.C. 11432;
(h) Local Department of Human Services offices;
(i) Courts;
(j) Legal aid;
(k) Coordinated care organizations, as described in ORS 414.572;
(L) Emergency shelter providers;
(m) Homeless service providers;
(n) Organizations serving and advocating for veterans, homeless youth, youth exiting the
foster care system, individuals exiting the  criminal justice system, people with disabilities
and aging adults, health care systems,  domestic violence and sexual assault survivors,
Enrolled House Bill 4123 (HB 4123-A) Page 2
members of lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer or questioning  (LGBTQ) communities,
people experiencing behavioral health and substance use disorders, faith communities  and
business communities; and
(o) The Housing and Community Services Department.
(6) In performing its duties under this section, a coordinated homeless response  system
shall coordinate with law enforcement, service providers and governing bodies  to implement
safe and humane processes to maintain public  and environmental health and safety, balanc-
ing important individual and community rights.
(7) A coordinated homeless response system may use grant funds in excess of those funds
needed by the system to accomplish the requirements  of the system under subsections (1)
to (6) of this section to support the delivery of homeless services and shelter consistent with
the five-year strategic plan, including through contracts with service providers.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2022 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to  the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending June 30,
2023, out of the General Fund, to provide grants under section 1 of this 2022 Act for  a coor-
dinated homeless response system:
(1) $1,000,000 to Benton County  for a response system consisting of Benton County, the
City of Corvallis and any other parties to the agreement forming the response system.
(2) $1,000,000 to Coos County for a response system consisting of  Coos County, the City
of Coos  Bay, the City of North Bend and any other parties to the agreement forming the
response system.
(3) $1,000,000 to Deschutes County for a response  system consisting of Deschutes County,
the City of Bend, the City of La Pine, the City of Redmond and the City of Sisters.
(4) $1,000,000 to Lincoln County  for a response system consisting of Lincoln County, the
City of Lincoln City, the City of Newport, the City of Toledo and any other  parties to the
agreement forming the response system.
(5) $1,000,000 to the Mid-Columbia  Community Action Council for a response system
consisting of the Mid-Columbia  Community Action Council, Hood River County, Sherman
County, Wasco County, the City of The Dalles, the City of Hood River and any other  parties
to the agreement forming the response system.
(6) $1,000,000 to  Polk County for a response system consisting of Polk County, the City
of Dallas, the City of Falls City, the City of Independence, the City of Monmouth, the  City
of Willamina, the  Confederated Tribes of the Grand Ronde, Mid-Willamette Valley Commu-
nity Action Agency and any other parties to the agreement forming the response system.
(7) $1,000,000 to Tillamook County for a response  system consisting of Tillamook County,
the City of Tillamook, Bay  City, the City of Garibaldi, the City of Rockaway Beach, the City
of Wheeler, the City of Manzanita,  Tillamook County Community Action Resources Enter-
prises, Inc. and any other parties to the agreement forming the response system.
(8) $1,000,000 to Umatilla County for a response system consisting of Umatilla County,
the City of Umatilla, the City of Stanfield, the City of Echo, the City of Hermiston and any
other parties to the agreement forming the response system.
SECTION 4.
This 2022 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2022 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4123 (HB 4123-A) Page 3
Passed by House March 2, 2022
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 3, 2022
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4123 (HB 4123-A) Page 4